Utah statutes.
76-8-811.   Bargaining rights of employees not impaired by sabotage prevention laws.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to impair, curtail, or destroy the rights of employees and their representatives to self organize, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in concerted activities, for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection as provided by state or federal laws.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

